Kentucky, session 2025RS, SB260.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 39G.030 is amended to read as follows:
Each year by November 1, the executive director of the Kentucky Office of Homeland
Security shall submit a written report to the Governor, the Auditor of Public Accounts,
the Legislative Research Commission, and the Interim Joint Committee on Seniors,
Veterans, Military Affairs, and Public Protection. The written report shall:
(1) Assess the Commonwealth's preparedness to respond to acts of war or terrorism,
including nuclear, biological, chemical, electromagnetic pulse, agro-, eco-, or
cyber-terrorism;
(2) Identify the priority of needs, areas of improvement, and the overall progress made
with regard to the Commonwealth's preparedness; and
(3) Provide a record of all federal homeland security funding, including grants,
gathered under KRS 39G.020 since the last annual written report, as well as any
other relevant homeland security funding information gathered by the Kentucky
Office of Homeland Security. The record shall identify, at a minimum, the specific
federal source, the amount, the specific recipient, the intended use of the funding,
the actual use of the funding, and any unspent amount.
(4) The Auditor of Public Accounts shall conduct an examination of revenues and
expenditures provided under the annual written report and under KRS
39G.020(2)(c) and, if examination findings warrant, shall conduct audits. No later
than January 30, the Auditor shall submit all examination and audit reports to the
Senate Veterans, Military Affairs, and Public Protection Committee and the House
Seniors, Military Affairs, and Public Safety Committee.
(5) (a) In addition to the annual report required under this section, the executive
director of the Office of Homeland Security shall provide to the Legislative
Research Commission and the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 2/17/2025 2:58 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1838
and Revenue a monthly[quarterly] report on the receipt and expenditure of
homeland security funds since the previous monthly[quarterly] report.
(b) The report shall identify, at a minimum, the following:
1. Amount and specific source of any homeland security funds received;
2. Specific expenditures by amount, recipient, and intended or actual use;
and
3. Balance of funds remaining in the account.
(c) The initial monthly[quarterly] report shall be submitted by October 15,
2025[2006], and shall contain the required information on receipts and
expenditures since the passage of the federal Homeland Security Act of 2002,
Pub. L. No. 107-296.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 2/17/2025 2:58 PM Jacketed